Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 686.040 is amended to read:
686.040. (1) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to  the following:
(a) Commissioned veterinary officers of the United States Army, or those in the employ  of other
United States Government agencies while engaged in their official capacity, unless they enter  into
a private practice.
(b) An individual who has received  training to verify whether cattle are pregnant and is
performing pregnancy verification services  on cattle within the scope of the individual’s
training.
(2) Nothing in ORS 167.322 or 686.020 (1)(a) shall be so construed as to prevent any person or
the agent or employee of the person from practicing  veterinary medicine and surgery or dentistry
in a humane manner on any animal belonging to the person, agent  or employee or for gratuitous
services or from dehorning and vaccinating cattle for the person, agent or employee.
(3) Nothing in ORS 686.020 (1)(a) shall be so construed  as to prevent the selling of veterinary
remedies and instruments by a licensed  pharmacist at the regular place of business of the licensed
pharmacist.
(4) A practitioner of allied health methods may practice that  method on animals without vio-
lating ORS 686.020 (1)(a), as long as the practice is in conformance with laws and rules  governing
the practitioner’s practice and the  practice is upon referral from a licensed veterinarian for treat-
ment or therapy specified by the veterinarian.
(5) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to the  lay testing of poultry by the whole blood
agglutination test.
(6) A  certified euthanasia technician holding an active, current certificate may inject sodium
pentobarbital,  sedative  and analgesic medications and any other euthanasia substance approved by
the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board without violating ORS 686.020 (1)(a).
(7) The board by rule  may specify circumstances under which unlicensed persons may give
vaccinations, administer an anesthetic or otherwise assist in the practice of veterinary medicine.
(8) Any individual licensed  as a veterinarian in another state may be used in consultation in this
state with a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state  provided the consultation
does not exceed 30 days in any 365 consecutive days.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1539 (SB 1539-A) Page 1
(9) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply  to authorized representatives of the State Department of
Agriculture in the discharge of any duty authorized by the department.
(10) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to an unlicensed representative of a livestock  association,
cow-testing  association,  or poultry association who, for the benefit of the association, takes blood
samples for laboratory tests for the diagnosis of livestock or poultry  diseases, but only if this person
has received authorization from the State Department of Agriculture following a written request  to
the department.
(11) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to persons permitted by the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife to rehabilitate orphaned, sick or injured wildlife, as defined in ORS 496.004, for the purpose
of restoring the animals to the wild.
(12) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to students,  agents or employees of public or private ed-
ucational or medical research institutions involved in educational  or research activities under the
auspices of those institutions.
(13) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to:
(a) Veterinarians employed by Oregon State University;
(b) Instructors of veterinary courses; or
(c) Students of veterinary science who participate in the diagnosis and treatment of animals  if
the students:
(A) Are participating in the diagnosis and treatment of animals while engaged in an  educational
program approved by the board or a college of veterinary medicine accredited by the  American
Veterinary Medical Association; and
(B) Are under the direct supervision of an Oregon licensed veterinarian or a veterinarian  ap-
proved by the board or Oregon State University to supervise students in the educational program.
(14) The Oregon State  Veterinary Medical Examining Board may by rule specify circum-
stances under which unlicensed persons may engage in activities  described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 686.040, as amended by section 1 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
686.040. (1) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to [ the following: ]
[(a)] commissioned veterinary officers of  the United States Army, or those in the employ of other
United States Government agencies while engaged in their official capacity, unless they enter  into
a private practice.
[(b) An individual who has received training to verify whether cattle are pregnant and is  per-
forming pregnancy verification services on cattle within the scope of the individual’s training. ]
(2) Nothing in ORS 167.322 or 686.020 (1)(a) shall be so construed as to prevent any person or
the agent or employee of the person  from practicing veterinary medicine and surgery or dentistry
in a humane manner on any  animal belonging to the person, agent or employee or for gratuitous
services or from dehorning and vaccinating cattle for the person, agent or employee.
(3) Nothing in ORS 686.020 (1)(a) shall be  so construed as to prevent the selling of veterinary
remedies and instruments by a licensed pharmacist at the regular place  of business of the licensed
pharmacist.
(4) A practitioner of allied health  methods may practice that method on animals without vio-
lating ORS  686.020 (1)(a), as long as the practice is in conformance with laws and rules governing
the practitioner’s practice and the practice is upon referral from a  licensed veterinarian for treat-
ment or therapy specified by the veterinarian.
(5) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to the  lay testing of poultry by the whole blood
agglutination test.
(6) A certified euthanasia technician holding an active, current certificate may inject  sodium
pentobarbital, sedative and analgesic medications and any other euthanasia substance approved  by
the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board without violating ORS 686.020 (1)(a).
(7) The board by rule may specify circumstances under which  unlicensed persons may give
vaccinations, administer an anesthetic or otherwise assist in the practice of veterinary medicine.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1539 (SB 1539-A) Page 2
(8) Any individual licensed  as a veterinarian in another state may be used in consultation in this
state with a person  licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state provided the consultation
does not exceed 30 days in any 365 consecutive days.
(9) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply  to authorized representatives of the State Department of
Agriculture in the discharge of any duty authorized by the department.
(10) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to an unlicensed representative of a livestock  association,
cow-testing association, or poultry association who, for the benefit of the association, takes  blood
samples for laboratory tests for the diagnosis of livestock or poultry  diseases, but only if this person
has received authorization from the State Department of Agriculture following a written request  to
the department.
(11) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to persons permitted by the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife to rehabilitate orphaned, sick or injured wildlife, as defined in ORS 496.004, for the purpose
of restoring the animals to the wild.
(12) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to students,  agents or employees of public or private ed-
ucational or medical research institutions involved  in educational or research activities under the
auspices of those institutions.
(13) ORS 686.020 (1)(a) does not apply to:
(a) Veterinarians employed by Oregon State University;
(b) Instructors of veterinary courses; or
(c) Students  of veterinary science who participate in the diagnosis and treatment of animals if
the students:
(A) Are participating in the diagnosis and treatment of animals while engaged in an  educational
program approved  by the board or a college of veterinary medicine accredited by the American
Veterinary Medical Association; and
(B) Are  under the direct supervision of an Oregon licensed veterinarian or a veterinarian ap-
proved by the board or Oregon State University to supervise students in the educational program.
[(14) The Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board may by  rule specify circumstances
under which unlicensed persons may engage in activities  described in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.]
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 686.040 by  section 2 of this 2026 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2031.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1539 (SB 1539-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate February 19, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 27, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1539 (SB 1539-A) Page 4